Nebraska, session 109, LB294.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. Section 81-3720, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-3720 (1)(a) The County Visitors Improvement Fund shall be administered
by the governing body of the county with the advice of the visitors committee
created pursuant to section 81-3717. The fund shall be used to make grants for
expanding and improving facilities at any existing visitor attraction,
acquiring or expanding exhibits for existing visitor attractions, constructing
visitor attractions, or planning or developing such expansions, improvements,
or construction.
(b) Grants shall be available for any visitor attraction in the county
owned by the public or any nonprofit organization, the primary purpose of which
is to operate the visitor attraction.
(c) Grants may be made for a specified annual amount not to exceed the
greater of the proceeds derived from a sales tax rate of one percent imposed by
a county for a County Visitors Improvement Fund or five thousand dollars.
Grants may be made for a term of years not to exceed twenty years and may be
pledged by the recipient to secure bonds issued to finance expansion,
improvement, or construction of a visitor attraction. Any grant made for a term
of years shall be funded each year in accordance with any agreement contained
in the grant contract.
(d) No bonds issued by a grant recipient which pledges grant funds shall
constitute a debt, liability, or general obligation of the county levying the
tax or a pledge of the faith and credit of the county levying the tax but shall
be payable solely from grant funds. Each bond issued by any grant recipient
which pledges grant funds shall contain on the face thereof a statement that
neither the faith and credit nor the taxing power of the county levying the tax
is pledged to the payment of the principal of or the interest on such bond.
(2) For purposes of this section and section 81-3717, visitor attraction
means a defined location open to the public, which location is of educational,
cultural, historical, artistic, or recreational significance or provides
entertainment or in which are exhibits, displays, or performances of
educational, cultural, historic, artistic, or entertainment value.
Sec. 2. Original section 81-3720, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is repealed.
Sec. 3. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when passed and
approved according to law.
-1-